Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4301
Public streets and sidewalks; sale of services or goods; permitted; closure; conditions.

(1) The city council of any city may permit the public streets and sidewalks within such city to be occupied and used under a lease, license, or other permission by a person, business, or others for the sale of services or goods and may permit the placement of nonpermanent sidewalk cafes, tables, chairs, benches, and other temporary improvements from which such sales can be transacted on the public streets and sidewalks.

(2) In addition to subsection (1) of this section, the city council of any city of the primary class may permit public streets and sidewalks to be closed and a fee to be charged for access to such streets and sidewalks if the following conditions have been met:

(a) The person seeking such permission is a tax-exempt nonprofit or charitable organization exempt from taxation by the federal government;

(b) The event for which a street or sidewalk is to be closed is conducted by and for the benefit of such nonprofit or charitable organization; and

(c) The nonprofit or charitable organization has obtained written consent to close such street or sidewalk for the duration of the permitted event from all of the owners of any land or lots abutting on the street or sidewalk to be closed.

Laws 1980, LB 848, § 23;

Laws 1990, LB 1076, § 1.